Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-615
Controlled-access highway, defined.

Controlled-access highway shall mean every highway or roadway in respect to which owners or occupants of abutting lands and other persons have no legal right of access to or egress from except at such points only and in such manner as may be determined by the public authority having jurisdiction over such highway.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 111.